Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2733.01
Partial-year resident; determination of income.

The income of a partial-year resident individual derived from sources within this state shall be the sum of the following:

(1) All of the income, gain, loss, and deduction which is derived from or connected with sources within this state for a nonresident individual under section 77-2733; and

(2) Any income from intangible personal property, including, but not limited to, annuities, dividends, interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible personal property and any income from a partnership, limited liability company, estate, trust, or electing subchapter S corporation, that is realized while a resident of this state and that is not taxed by another state.

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 17;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 507.